Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB311.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1302 and 4703(b) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1302. Vehicles exempt from registration.The following types of vehicles are exempt from registration:* * *(2.3) A commercial implement of husbandry being operated on a highway within 50 miles of a place of business owned by the owner of the commercial implement of husbandry for the purpose of transporting the commercial implement of husbandry to a farm or farms located within 50 miles of the commercial vehicle owner's place of business, regardless of whether the 12345678910111213141516171819 commercial implement of husbandry is operated by the owner or another individual.* * *§ 4703. Operation of vehicle without official certificate of inspection.* * *(b) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) does not apply to:* * *(2.2) A commercial implement of husbandry exempt from registration under section 1302(2.3) (relating to vehicles exempt from registration).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0311PN0264 - 2 - 12345678910111213